District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.11

Construction.

Wherever the regulations made under the authority of this subchapter require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces, or require a lower height of buildings or smaller number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required in or under any other statute or municipal regulations, the regulations made under authority of said sections shall govern. Wherever the provisions of any other statute or municipal regulations require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces or require a lower height of buildings or smaller number of stories or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied or impose other higher standards than are required by the regulations made under authority of said sections, the provisions of such other statute or municipal regulation shall govern.

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 801, ch. 534, § 12
1981 Ed., § 5-428.
1973 Ed., § 5-424.